Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2566.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 9-500.39, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE9-500.39. Limits on regulation of vacation rentals and short-term rentals; state preemption; civil penalties; transaction privilege tax license suspension; definitions A. A city or town may not prohibit vacation rentals or short-term rentals. B. A city or town may not restrict the use of or regulate vacation rentals or short-term rentals based on their classification, use or occupancy except as provided in this section.  A city or town may regulate vacation rentals or short-term rentals as follows: 1. To protect the public's health and safety, including rules and regulations related to fire and building codes, health and sanitation, transportation or traffic control and solid or hazardous waste and pollution control, if the city or town demonstrates that the rule or regulation is for the primary purpose of protecting the public's health and safety. 2. To adopt and enforce use and zoning ordinances, including ordinances related to noise, protection of welfare, property maintenance and other nuisance issues, if the ordinance is applied in the same manner as other property classified under sections 42-12003 and 42-12004. 3. To limit or prohibit the use of a vacation rental or short-term rental for the purposes of housing sex offenders, operating or maintaining a sober living home, selling illegal drugs, liquor control or pornography, obscenity, nude or topless dancing and other adult-oriented businesses or other nonresidential use. 4. To require the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental to provide the city or town with a copy of the owner's valid transaction privilege tax license and with emergency contact information for the owner or the owner's designee who is responsible for responding to complaints or emergencies in a timely manner in person if required by public safety personnel, over the phone telephone or by email at any time of day before offering for rent or renting the vacation rental or short-term rental. In addition to any other penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the city or town may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 against the owner for every thirty days the owner fails to provide a copy of the owner's valid transaction privilege tax license or contact information as prescribed by this paragraph. The city or town shall provide thirty days' notice to the owner before imposing the initial civil penalty. 5. To require the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental to obtain and maintain a local regulatory permit or license.  As a condition of issuance of a permit or license, the application for the permit or license may require an applicant to provide only the following: (a) The name, address, telephone number and email address for the owner or owner's agent. (b) The address of the vacation rental or short-term rental. (c) Proof of compliance with section 42-5005. (d) Contact information required pursuant to paragraph 4 of this subsection. (e) Acknowledgment of an agreement to comply with all applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. (f) A fee not to exceed the actual cost of issuing the permit or license or $250 $500, whichever is less. 6. To require, before offering a vacation rental or short-term rental for rent for the first time, the owner or the owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental to notify all single-family residential properties adjacent to and directly and diagonally across the street from the vacation rental or short-term rental. Notice shall be deemed sufficient in a multifamily residential building if given to residents on the same building floor. A city or town may require additional notification pursuant to this paragraph if the contact information previously provided changes. Notification provided in compliance with this paragraph shall include the permit or license number if required by the city or town, the address of the vacation rental or short-term rental and the information required pursuant to paragraph 4 of this subsection. The owner or the owner's designee shall demonstrate compliance with this paragraph by providing the city or town with an attestation of notification compliance that consists of the following information: (a) The permit or license number of the vacation rental or short-term rental, if required by the city or town. (b) The address of each property notified. (c) A description of the manner in which the owner or owner's designee chose to provide notification to each property subject to notification. (d) The name and contact information of the person attesting to compliance with this paragraph. 7. To require the owner or owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental to display the local regulatory permit number or license number, if any, on each advertisement for a vacation rental or short-term rental that the owner or owner's designee maintains.  A city or town that does not require a local regulatory permit or license may shall require the owner or owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental to display the transaction privilege tax license number required by section 42-5042 on each advertisement for a vacation rental or short-term rental that the owner or owner's designee maintains. 8. To require the vacation rental or short-term rental to maintain liability insurance appropriate to cover the vacation rental or short-term rental in the aggregate of at least $500,000 or to advertise and offer each vacation rental or short-term rental through an online lodging marketplace that provides equal or greater coverage. 9. To require the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental to reside on the property if the property contains an accessory dwelling unit and if a certificate of occupancy, certificate of completion or similar final approval for the accessory dwelling unit was issued by the municipality on or after September 14, 2024.  This paragraph does not apply to an owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental if the property contains an accessory dwelling unit and the certificate of completion, the certificate of occupancy or a similar final approval for the accessory dwelling unit was issued on or before September 13, 2024. C. A city or town that requires a local regulatory permit or license pursuant to this section shall issue or deny the permit or license within seven thirty business days of receipt of after receiving the information required by subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section and otherwise in accordance with section 9-835, except that a city or town may deny issuance of a permit or license only for any of the following: 1. Failure to provide the information required by subsection B, paragraph 5, subdivisions (a) through (e) of this section. 2. Failure to pay the required permit or license fee. 3. At the time of application the owner has a suspended permit or license or has outstanding civil penalties for the same vacation rental or short-term rental. 4. A previous owner of the property had a suspended permit or license or has outstanding civil penalties for the same vacation rental or short-term rental property. 4. 5. The applicant provides false information. 5. 6. The owner or owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental is a registered sex offender or has been convicted of any felony offense that resulted in death or serious physical injury or any felony use of a deadly weapon within the past five years. D. A city or town that requires a local regulatory permit or license pursuant to this section shall adopt an ordinance to allow the city or town to initiate an administrative process to suspend a local regulatory permit or license for a period of up to twelve months for the following verified violations associated with a property: 1. Three verified violations within a twelve-month period, not including any verified violation based on an aesthetic, solid waste disposal or vehicle parking violation that is not also a serious threat to public health and safety. 2. One verified violation that results in or constitutes any of the following: (a) A felony offense committed at or in the vicinity of a vacation rental or short-term rental by the vacation rental or short-term rental owner or owner's designee. (b) A serious physical injury or wrongful death at or related to a vacation rental or short-term rental resulting from the knowing, intentional or reckless conduct of the vacation rental or short-term rental owner or owner's designee. (c) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally housing a sex offender, allowing offenses related to adult-oriented businesses, sexual offenses or prostitution, or operating or maintaining a sober living home, in violation of a regulation or ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 3 of this section. (d) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally allowing the use of a vacation rental or short-term rental for a special event that would otherwise require a permit or license pursuant to a city or town ordinance or a state law or rule or for a retail, restaurant, banquet space or other similar use. (e) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally allowing the use of a vacation rental or short-term rental for nonresidential use. (f) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally avoiding paying transaction privilege tax for bookings made without the use of an online lodging marketplace that is registered with the department of revenue pursuant to section 42-5005. 3. Notwithstanding paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection, any attempted or completed felony offense, arising from the occupancy or use of a vacation rental or short-term rental,  that results in a death, or actual or attempted serious physical injury, shall be grounds for judicial relief in the form of a suspension of the property's use as a vacation rental or short-term rental for a period of time that shall not exceed not more than twelve months. E. A city or town that requires sex offender background checks on a vacation rental or short-term rental guest shall waive the requirement if an online lodging marketplace performs a sex offender background check of the booking guest and maintains an electronic copy of the sex offender background check that can be readily accessed by law enforcement agencies. F. Notwithstanding any other law, a city or town may impose a civil penalty of the following amounts against an owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental if the owner receives one or more verified violations related to the same vacation rental or short-term rental property within the same twelve-month period: 1. Up to $500 or up to an amount equal to one night's rent for the vacation rental or short-term rental as advertised, whichever is greater, for the first verified violation. 2. Up to $1,000 or up to an amount equal to two nights' rent for the vacation rental or short-term rental as advertised, whichever is greater, for the second verified violation. 3. Up to $3,500 or up to an amount equal to three nights' rent for the vacation rental or short-term rental as advertised, whichever is greater, for a third and any subsequent verified violation. G. A vacation rental or short-term rental that fails to apply for a local regulatory permit or license in accordance with subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section, within thirty days of after the local regulatory permit or license application process being made available by the city or town issuing such permits or licenses, must cease operations.  In addition to any civil penalties imposed pursuant to subsection F of this section, a city or town may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 per month against the owner if the owner or owner's designee fails to apply for a regulatory permit or license within thirty days after receiving written notice of the failure to comply with subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section. H. If multiple verified violations arise out of the same response to an incident at a vacation rental or short-term rental, those verified violations are may be considered one verified violation for the purpose of assessing civil penalties or suspending the regulatory permit or license of the owner pursuant to this section. I. If the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental has provided contact information to a city or town pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section and if the city or town issues a citation for a violation of the city's or town's applicable laws, regulations or ordinances or a state law that occurred on the owner's vacation rental or short-term rental property, the city or town shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the owner or the owner's designee of the citation within seven business days after the citation is issued using the contact information provided pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section.  If the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental has not provided contact information pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section, the city or town is not required to provide such notice. J. This section does not exempt an owner of a residential rental property, as defined in section 33-1901, from maintaining with the assessor of the county in which the property is located information required under title 33, chapter 17, article 1. K. A vacation rental or short-term rental may not be used for nonresidential uses, including for a special event that would otherwise require a permit or license pursuant to a city or town ordinance or a state law or rule or for a retail, restaurant, banquet space or other similar use. l. Any penalties or suspensions assessed pursuant to this section are associated with the vacation rental or short-term rental property, and are subject to transfer to a subsequent vacation rental or short-term rental owner of that property. M. Any ACCOMMODATION that does not meet the definition of vacation rental or short-term rental may be regulated by the city or town as a hotel, motel or similar ACCOMMODATION. L. N. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Accessory dwelling unit" has the same meaning prescribed in section 9-461.18. 2. "Online lodging marketplace" has the same meaning prescribed in section 42-5076. 3. "Transient" has the same meaning prescribed in section 42-5070. 4. "Vacation rental" or "short-term rental": (a) Means any individually or collectively owned single-family or one-to-four-family house or dwelling unit or any unit or group of units in a condominium or cooperative that is also a transient public lodging establishment or owner-occupied residential home offered for transient use if the accommodations are not classified for property taxation under section 42-12001. (b) Does not include a unit that is used for any nonresidential use, including retail, restaurant, banquet space, event center or another similar use. 4. "vacation rental" or "short-term rental": (a) means any individually or collectively owned single-family or one-to-four FAMILY house or dwelling unit, any unit or group of units in a condominium, rental complex, building or cooperative or an owner's principal residence offered for transient use as follows: (i) For less than sixty days per year without an owner or owner's designee residing on-site during transient use. (ii) For less than one hundred twenty days per year with the owner or owner's designee residing on-site during transient use. (iii) For less than sixty days per year as a whole property rental. (iv) For less than one hundred twenty days per year as a room rental with the owner or owner's designee residing on-site during transient use. (v) For less than one hundred twenty days per year as hotel transient lodging accommodations, if the accommodations are not classified for taxation under section 42-12001. (b) Does not INCLUDe any unit offered for transient lodging accommodation use as follows: (i) For more than one hundred twenty days per year. (ii) For more than sixty days per year as a whole property rental. (iii) For more than one hundred days per year as hotel transient lodging accommodations. (iv) through a rental agreement, lease, sublease or occupancy agreement for a period of less than THIRTY days. (c) Does not include a unit that is used for any nonresidential use, including retail, restaurant, banquet space, event center or other similar use. 5. "Verified violation" means a finding of guilt or civil responsibility for violating any state law or local ordinance relating to a purpose prescribed in subsection B, D, F or K of this section that has been finally adjudicated. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 11-269.17, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-269.17. Limits on regulation of vacation rentals and short-term rentals; state preemption; civil penalties; transaction privilege tax license suspension; definitions A. A county may not prohibit vacation rentals or short-term rentals. B. A county may not restrict the use of or regulate vacation rentals or short-term rentals based on their classification, use or occupancy except as provided in this section. A county may regulate vacation rentals or short-term rentals within the unincorporated areas of the county as follows: 1. To protect the public's health and safety, including rules and regulations related to fire and building codes, health and sanitation, transportation or traffic control and solid or hazardous waste and pollution control, if the county demonstrates that the rule or regulation is for the primary purpose of protecting the public's health and safety. 2. To adopt and enforce use and zoning ordinances, including ordinances related to noise, protection of welfare, property maintenance and other nuisance issues, if the ordinance is applied in the same manner as other property classified under sections 42-12003 and 42-12004. 3. To limit or prohibit the use of a vacation rental or short-term rental for the purposes of housing sex offenders, operating or maintaining a sober living home, selling illegal drugs, liquor control or pornography, obscenity, nude or topless dancing and other adult-oriented businesses or other nonresidential use. 4. To require the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental to provide the county with a copy of the owner's valid transaction privilege tax license and with emergency contact information for the owner or the owner's designee who is responsible for responding to complaints or emergencies in a timely manner in person if required by public safety personnel, over the phone telephone or by email at any time of day before offering for rent or renting the vacation rental or short-term rental. In addition to any other penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the county may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 against the owner for every thirty days the owner fails to provide a copy of the owner's valid transaction privilege tax license or contact information as prescribed by this paragraph. The county shall provide thirty days' notice to the owner before imposing the initial civil penalty. 5. To require the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental to obtain and maintain a local regulatory permit or license. As a condition of issuance of a permit or license, the application for the permit or license may require an applicant to provide only the following: (a) The name, address, telephone number and email address for the owner or owner's agent. (b) The address of the vacation rental or short-term rental. (c) Proof of compliance with section 42-5005. (d) Contact information required pursuant to paragraph 4 of this subsection. (e) Acknowledgment of an agreement to comply with all applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. (f) A fee not to exceed the actual cost of issuing the permit or license or $250 $500, whichever is less. 6. To require, before offering a vacation rental or short-term rental for rent for the first time, the owner or the owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental to notify all single-family residential properties adjacent to and directly and diagonally across the street from the vacation rental or short-term rental.  Notice shall be deemed sufficient in a multifamily residential building if given to residents on the same building floor.  A county may require additional notification pursuant to this paragraph if the contact information previously provided changes. Notification provided in compliance with this paragraph shall include the permit or license number if required by the county, the address of the vacation rental or short-term rental and the contact information required pursuant to paragraph 4 of this subsection. The owner or the owner's designee shall demonstrate compliance with this paragraph by providing the county with an attestation of notification compliance that consists of the following information: (a) The permit or license number of the vacation rental or short-term rental, if required by the county. (b) The address of each property notified. (c) A description of the manner in which the owner or owner's designee chose to provide notification to each property subject to notification. (d) The name and contact information of the person attesting to compliance with this paragraph. 7. To require the owner or owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental to display the local regulatory permit number or license number, if any, on each advertisement for a vacation rental or short-term rental that the owner or owner's designee maintains.  A county that does not require a local regulatory permit or license may shall require the owner or owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental to display the transaction privilege tax license number required by section 42-5042 on each advertisement for a vacation rental or short-term rental that the owner or owner's designee maintains. 8. To require the vacation rental or short-term rental to maintain liability insurance appropriate to cover the vacation rental or short-term rental in the aggregate of at least $500,000 or to advertise and offer each vacation rental or short-term rental through an online lodging marketplace that provides equal or greater coverage. 9. To require the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental to reside on the property if the property contains an accessory dwelling unit and if a certificate of occupancy, certificate of completion or similar final approval for the accessory dwelling unit was issued by the county on or after September 14, 2024.  This paragraph does not apply to an owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental if the property contains an accessory dwelling unit and the certificate of completion, the certificate of occupancy or a similar final approval for the accessory dwelling unit was issued on or before September 13, 2024. C. A county that requires a local regulatory permit or license pursuant to this section shall issue or deny the permit or license within seven thirty business days of receipt of after receiving the information required by subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section and otherwise in accordance with section 11-1602, except that a county may deny issuance of a permit or license only for any of the following: 1. Failure to provide the information required by subsection B, paragraph 5, subdivisions (a) through (e) of this section. 2. Failure to pay the required permit or license fee. 3. At the time of application the owner has a suspended permit or license or has unpaid civil penalties for the same vacation rental or short-term rental. 4. A previous owner of the property had a suspended permit or license or had outstanding civil penalties for the same vacation rental or short-term rental property. 4. 5. The applicant provides false information. 5. 6. The owner or owner's designee of a vacation rental or short-term rental is a registered sex offender or has been convicted of any felony offense that results in death or serious physical injury or any felony use of a deadly weapon within the past five years. D. A county that requires a local regulatory permit or license pursuant to this section shall adopt an ordinance to allow the county to initiate an administrative process to suspend a local regulatory permit or license for a period of up to twelve months for the following verified violations associated with a property: 1. Three verified violations within a twelve-month period, not including any verified violation based on an aesthetic, solid waste disposal or vehicle parking violation that is not also a serious threat to public health or safety. 2. One verified violation that results in or constitutes any of the following: (a) A felony offense committed at or in the vicinity of a vacation rental or short-term rental by the vacation rental or short-term rental owner or owner's designee. (b) A serious physical injury or wrongful death at or related to a vacation rental or short-term rental resulting from the knowing, intentional or reckless conduct of the vacation rental or short-term rental owner or owner's designee. (c) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally housing a sex offender, allowing offenses related to adult-oriented businesses, sexual offenses or prostitution, or operating or maintaining a sober living home, in violation of regulation or ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 3 of this section. (d) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally allowing the use of a vacation rental or short-term rental for a special event that would otherwise require a permit or license pursuant to a county ordinance or a state law or rule or for a retail, restaurant, banquet space or other similar use. (e) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally allowing the use of a vacation rental or short-term rental for nonresidential use. (f) An owner or owner's designee knowingly or intentionally avoiding paying transaction privilege tax for bookings made WITHOUT the use of an online lodging marketplace that is registered with the department of revenue pursuant to section 42-5005. 3. Notwithstanding paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection, any attempted or completed felony offense, arising from the occupancy or use of a vacation rental or short-term rental,  that results in a death,  or actual or attempted serious physical injury,  shall be grounds for judicial relief in the form of a suspension of the property's use as a vacation rental or short-term rental for a period of time that shall not exceed NOT MORE THAN twelve months. E. A county that requires sex offender background checks on a vacation rental or short-term rental guest shall waive the requirement if an online lodging marketplace performs a sex offender background check of the booking guest AND MAINTAINS AN ELECTRONIC COPY OF THE SEX OFFENDER BACKGROUND CHECK THAT CAN BE READILY ACCESSED BY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. F. Notwithstanding any other law, a county may impose a civil penalty of the following amounts against an owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental if the owner receives one or more verified violations related to the same vacation rental or short-term rental property within the same twelve-month period: 1. Up to $500 or up to an amount equal to one night's rent for the vacation rental or short-term rental as advertised, whichever is greater, for the first verified violation. 2. Up to $1,000 or up to an amount equal to two nights' rent for the vacation rental or short-term rental as advertised, whichever is greater, for the second verified violation. 3. Up to $3,500 or up to an amount equal to three nights' rent for the vacation rental or short-term rental as advertised, whichever is greater, for a third and any subsequent verified violation. G. A vacation rental or short-term rental that fails to apply for a local regulatory permit or license in accordance with subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section, within thirty days of the local regulatory permit or license application process being made available by the county issuing such permits or licenses, must cease operations. In addition to any civil penalties imposed pursuant to subsection F of this section, a county may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 per month against the owner if the owner or owner's designee fails to apply for a regulatory permit or license within thirty days after receiving written notice of the failure to comply with subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section. H. If multiple verified violations arise out of the same response to an incident at a vacation rental or short-term rental, those verified violations are MAY BE considered one verified violation for the purpose of assessing civil penalties or suspending the regulatory permit or license of the owner pursuant to this section. I. If the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental has provided contact information to a county pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section and if the county issues a citation for a violation of the county's applicable laws, regulations or ordinances or a state law that occurred on the owner's vacation rental or short-term rental property, the county shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the owner or the owner's designee of the citation within seven business days after the citation is issued using the contact information provided pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section.  If the owner of a vacation rental or short-term rental has not provided contact information pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section, the county is not required to provide such notice. J. This section does not exempt an owner of a residential rental property, as defined in section 33-1901, from maintaining with the assessor of the county in which the property is located information required under title 33, chapter 17, article 1. K. A vacation rental or short-term rental may not be used for nonresidential uses, including for a special event that would otherwise require a permit or license pursuant to a county ordinance or a state law or rule or for a retail, restaurant, banquet space or other similar use. l. Any penalties or suspensions assessed pursuant to this section are associated with the vacation rental or short-term rental property, and are subject to transfer to a subsequent vacation rental or short-term rental owner of that property. M. Any ACCOMMODATION that does not meet the definition of vacation rental or short-term rental may be regulated by the city or town as a hotel, motel or similar ACCOMMODATION. L. N. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Accessory dwelling unit" has the same meaning prescribed in section 11-810.01. 2. "Online lodging marketplace" has the same meaning prescribed in section 42-5076. 3. "Transient" has the same meaning prescribed in section 42-5070. 4. "Vacation rental" or "short-term rental": (a) Means any individually or collectively owned single-family or one-to-four-family house or dwelling unit or any unit or group of units in a condominium or cooperative that is also a transient public lodging establishment or owner-occupied residential home offered for transient use if the accommodations are not classified for property taxation under section 42-12001. (b) Does not include a unit that is used for any nonresidential use, including retail, restaurant, banquet space, event center or another similar use. 4. "vacation rental" or "short-term rental": (a) means any individually or collectively owned single-family or one-to-four FAMILY house or dwelling unit, any unit or group of units in a condominium, rental complex, building or cooperative or an owner's principal residence offered for transient use as follows: (i) For less than sixty days per year without an owner or owner's designee residing on-site during transient use. (ii) For less than one hundred twenty days per year with the owner or owner's designee residing on-site during transient use. (iii) For less than sixty days per year as a whole property rental. (iv) For less than one hundred twenty days per year as a room rental with the owner or owner's designee residing on-site during transient use. (v) For less than one hundred twenty days per year as hotel transient lodging accommodations, if the accommodations are not classified for taxation under section 42-12001. (b) Does not INCLUDe any unit offered for transient lodging accommodation use as follows: (i) For more than one hundred twenty days per year. (ii) For more than sixty days per year as a whole property rental. (iii) For more than one hundred days per year as hotel transient lodging accommodations. (iv) through a rental agreement, lease, sublease or occupancy agreement for a period of less than THIRTY days. (c) Does not include a unit that is used for any nonresidential use, including retail, restaurant, banquet space, event center or other similar use. 5. "Verified violation" means a finding of guilt or civil responsibility for violating any state law or local ordinance relating to a purpose prescribed in subsection B, D, F or K of this section that has been finally adjudicated. END_STATUTE